Florida, session 2026, SB1408.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 18 19 Section 1.âThis act may be cited as the âEconomic Self 20 Sufficiency for Working Individuals with Disabilities Act.â 21 Section 2.âSection 409.9141, Florida Statutes, is created 22 to read: 23 409.9141âMedicaid buy-in program for individuals with 24 disabilities.â 25 (1)(a)âContingent upon federal approval through a Medicaid 26 waiver or state plan amendment, the agency shall implement and 27 administer a Medicaid buy-in program, authorized under the 28 Ticket to Work and Work Incentives Improvement Act of 1999, Pub. 29 L. No. 106-170, and the Balanced Budget Act of 1997, Pub. L. No. 30 105-33, for individuals with disabilities between 18 and 64 31 years of age who work and whose incomes exceed the maximum 32 income eligibility level for initial enrollment to obtain 33 coverage for medical assistance under the Medicaid program. The 34 agency shall determine the new income eligibility level for such 35 individuals. 36 (b)âThe Medicaid buy-in program under paragraph (a) must 37 provide full Medicaid benefits to eligible individuals and limit 38 any premium or cost sharing to a percentage of an individualâs 39 income, as determined by the agency. 40 (2)âBy October 1, 2026, the agency shall seek federal 41 approval through a Medicaid waiver or state plan amendment as 42 necessary to implement the Medicaid buy-in program under this 43 section. The agency shall implement and administer the Medicaid 44 buy-in program upon receiving federal approval. 45 Section 3.âThis act shall take effect upon becoming a law.